lrec2010_examples/noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +mas +fem +Sg +Pl
LEXICON Root

Noun ;
LEXICON Ninf

o+N+Sg+mas:^o   #;
a+N+Sg+fem:^a   #;
o+N+Pl+mas:^os  #;
a+N+Pl+fem:^as  #;
ción+N+Sg+fem:^ción #;
ciones+N+Pl+fem:^ciones #;
ma+N+Sg+mas:^ma #;
pa+N+Sg+mas:^pa #;
ta+N+Sg+mas:^ta #;
ma+N+Pl+mas:^mas #;
pa+N+Pl+mas:^pas #;
ta+N+Pl+mas:^tas #;
+N+sg:0 #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Noun
abogacía Ninf;
absolución Ninf;
acarreo Ninf;
acertijo Ninf;
acreedora Ninf;
acústica Ninf;
adelmaro Ninf;
admiración Ninf;
adulona Ninf;
aficionado Ninf;
agarrón Ninf;
agregada Ninf;
aguijada Ninf;
aixa Ninf;
alardo Ninf;
albufera Ninf;
aldeana Ninf;
alevín Ninf;
álgebra Ninf;
aljibe Ninf;
alpaca Ninf;
alucinación Ninf;
amalgama Ninf;
ámbar Ninf;
amílcar Ninf;
anacronismo Ninf;
ancho Ninf;
anexión Ninf;
animadora Ninf;
antena Ninf;
antisemitismo Ninf;
aparcera Ninf;
apicultura Ninf;
aprehensión Ninf;
araceli Ninf;
arcano Ninf;
argenta Ninf;
aritmético Ninf;
arpa Ninf;
arreo Ninf;
articulación Ninf;
asceta Ninf;
asilada Ninf;
astillero Ninf;
atardecer Ninf;
atracción Ninf;
augusto Ninf;
autocracia Ninf;
autosuficiencia Ninf;
aviador Ninf;
azadón Ninf;
bable Ninf;
bajista Ninf;
balear Ninf;
bandería Ninf;
barbaridad Ninf;
barrena Ninf;
basilisco Ninf;
bautismo Ninf;
begoña Ninf;
benedicto Ninf;
bernabela Ninf;
bibliófilo Ninf;
bígamo Ninf;
bisojo Ninf;
blusón Ninf;
bogotana Ninf;
bomba Ninf;
boris Ninf;
botín Ninf;
brazo Ninf;
brizna Ninf;
bufanda Ninf;
buñuelo Ninf;
cábala Ninf;
cabotaje Ninf;
cachivachera Ninf;
caimán Ninf;
calculadora Ninf;
calímaco Ninf;
cámara Ninf;
camión Ninf;
cana Ninf;
candidata Ninf;
cantaor Ninf;
cañonero Ninf;
capricho Ninf;
carbono Ninf;
cargo Ninf;
carnaza Ninf;
carro Ninf;
casamiento Ninf;
caspa Ninf;
cataclismo Ninf;
catolicidad Ninf;
caverna Ninf;
cédula Ninf;
célula Ninf;
centrista Ninf;
cerillero Ninf;
césped Ninf;
ciento Ninf;
cinemascope Ninf;
cirenia Ninf;
clara Ninf;
clelia Ninf;
clovis Ninf;
cocodrilo Ninf;
cofre Ninf;
coleccionista Ninf;
colón Ninf;
combatividad Ninf;
comilona Ninf;
compensación Ninf;
compresora Ninf;
concilio Ninf;
conducto Ninf;
conforme Ninf;
conmutación Ninf;
conservadora Ninf;
consuelo Ninf;
contienda Ninf;
contrasentido Ninf;
convicción Ninf;
cora Ninf;
corneja Ninf;
correo Ninf;
corzo Ninf;
cotización Ninf;
cretina Ninf;
cristalización Ninf;
crudo Ninf;
cuarterón Ninf;
cuchipanda Ninf;
cultivo Ninf;
curriculum Ninf;
chalet Ninf;
chapuz Ninf;
chatarra Ninf;
chicha Ninf;
chinchorrera Ninf;
chispo Ninf;
chorro Ninf;
dacil Ninf;
daniela Ninf;
decaimiento Ninf;
defendida Ninf;
deleite Ninf;
demoniaca Ninf;
derecha Ninf;
desalmado Ninf;
descaro Ninf;
desecho Ninf;
desgracia Ninf;
desmán Ninf;
despojo Ninf;
desventaja Ninf;
devoto Ninf;
dicharacho Ninf;
dimitri Ninf;
dique Ninf;
disgusto Ninf;
disuasión Ninf;
dogmático Ninf;
donativo Ninf;
drogadicción Ninf;
ebanista Ninf;
edad Ninf;
edredón Ninf;
egisto Ninf;
elástico Ninf;
eleonora Ninf;
elmer Ninf;
embarque Ninf;
emigrante Ninf;
emperatriz Ninf;
encanto Ninf;
endemia Ninf;
engaste Ninf;
ensamblaje Ninf;
entredicho Ninf;
envidioso Ninf;
equilibrista Ninf;
ernestina Ninf;
escalope Ninf;
escepticismo Ninf;
escribanía Ninf;
esfuerzo Ninf;
española Ninf;
espina Ninf;
esquirol Ninf;
estanciero Ninf;
estilístico Ninf;
estrella Ninf;
etarra Ninf;
europea Ninf;
exabrupto Ninf;
exequias Ninf;
explicación Ninf;
extrañeza Ninf;
fabricación Ninf;
falco Ninf;
fantoche Ninf;
fatalidad Ninf;
federico Ninf;
fernando Ninf;
fidela Ninf;
filial Ninf;
finesa Ninf;
flaminia Ninf;
floricultor Ninf;
fondeadero Ninf;
fortificación Ninf;
francesada Ninf;
frazada Ninf;
frondosidad Ninf;
fullería Ninf;
fusilero Ninf;
gaia Ninf;
galope Ninf;
ganga Ninf;
garrapata Ninf;
gazapera Ninf;
génesis Ninf;
gerda Ninf;
giba Ninf;
gitano Ninf;
gol Ninf;
gorrón Ninf;
gráfico Ninf;
granja Ninf;
griega Ninf;
gruñido Ninf;
guardabarros Ninf;
guerra Ninf;
güisqui Ninf;
haz Ninf;
haragán Ninf;
hez Ninf;
hélice Ninf;
herboristería Ninf;
hermógenes Ninf;
hidalgo Ninf;
hilacho Ninf;
hipnosis Ninf;
historiadora Ninf;
hollín Ninf;
honra Ninf;
horticultura Ninf;
huerto Ninf;
hurgón Ninf;
ideario Ninf;
ilegalidad Ninf;
imperfecto Ninf;
impúdico Ninf;
incomodo Ninf;
indígena Ninf;
inferioridad Ninf;
ingreso Ninf;
inquisidor Ninf;
insubordinación Ninf;
interina Ninf;
íntimo Ninf;
investigación Ninf;
irracional Ninf;
ismael Ninf;
jabalí Ninf;
jamila Ninf;
jemina Ninf;
joana Ninf;
joven Ninf;
julián Ninf;
káiser Ninf;
kilovatio Ninf;
lacería Ninf;
lámina Ninf;
lapa Ninf;
latinismo Ninf;
lazarillo Ninf;
legionario Ninf;
lenocinio Ninf;
leopoldina Ninf;
lía Ninf;
liborio Ninf;
lienzo Ninf;
lina Ninf;
lis Ninf;
lóbulo Ninf;
longevidad Ninf;
luciana Ninf;
lupa Ninf;
llanura Ninf;
madrastra Ninf;
magnetófono Ninf;
malamente Ninf;
maligno Ninf;
mancebo Ninf;
manifestación Ninf;
mantenido Ninf;
mar Ninf;
marfil Ninf;
marino Ninf;
martín Ninf;
matemático Ninf;
mauritano Ninf;
mecenas Ninf;
meditación Ninf;
melina Ninf;
mendigo Ninf;
mentor Ninf;
mermar Ninf;
metro Ninf;
miel Ninf;
milos Ninf;
minusválido Ninf;
misericordiosa Ninf;
modalidad Ninf;
mojigato Ninf;
moneda Ninf;
montero Ninf;
moroso Ninf;
motonave Ninf;
mugido Ninf;
muralismo Ninf;
myrna Ninf;
naná Ninf;
natalí Ninf;
navila Ninf;
negociación Ninf;
nerina Ninf;
nicolás Ninf;
nitidez Ninf;
nonagenaria Ninf;
notoriedad Ninf;
nuez Ninf;
ñoña Ninf;
obscena Ninf;
octavio Ninf;
oficinista Ninf;
olimpia Ninf;
onomatopeya Ninf;
oracional Ninf;
orfebre Ninf;
orión Ninf;
osmar Ninf;
oxígeno Ninf;
página Ninf;
palestina Ninf;
pamela Ninf;
panificación Ninf;
papelera Ninf;
paralítica Ninf;
paria Ninf;
partición Ninf;
pasarela Ninf;
patíbulo Ninf;
patronato Ninf;
pecador Ninf;
peine Ninf;
peluquería Ninf;
pentecostés Ninf;
perdido Ninf;
peripecia Ninf;
perseo Ninf;
pescado Ninf;
petrus Ninf;
piedra Ninf;
pincel Ninf;
piquete Ninf;
pivote Ninf;
plástico Ninf;
pliego Ninf;
podenco Ninf;
polígono Ninf;
pomposidad Ninf;
porro Ninf;
posguerra Ninf;
preámbulo Ninf;
prehistoria Ninf;
preservativo Ninf;
previsión Ninf;
prisionera Ninf;
productividad Ninf;
proletario Ninf;
proposición Ninf;
protestante Ninf;
prurito Ninf;
pugna Ninf;
punto Ninf;
quebrado Ninf;
quetzal Ninf;
quino Ninf;
quórum Ninf;
radiofonía Ninf;
ramada Ninf;
rapto Ninf;
ratrudis Ninf;
rebaño Ninf;
recinto Ninf;
recoveco Ninf;
referendo Ninf;
regente Ninf;
relajación Ninf;
remolcador Ninf;
reo Ninf;
reproductor Ninf;
resignación Ninf;
resuello Ninf;
reuma Ninf;
reyerta Ninf;
risotada Ninf;
rodrigo Ninf;
rompeolas Ninf;
rosendo Ninf;
rueca Ninf;
rutinario Ninf;
sacudida Ninf;
salsera Ninf;
sandalia Ninf;
sara Ninf;
sean Ninf;
seducción Ninf;
sembradío Ninf;
sentimentalismo Ninf;
sergio Ninf;
severo Ninf;
signatura Ninf;
simpatía Ninf;
sinrazón Ninf;
sobrante Ninf;
sofocación Ninf;
solución Ninf;
soprano Ninf;
subconciencia Ninf;
sucesor Ninf;
suicidio Ninf;
supremacía Ninf;
susurro Ninf;
tacio Ninf;
talón Ninf;
taparrabo Ninf;
tarquino Ninf;
técnica Ninf;
telefilm Ninf;
temor Ninf;
tentáculo Ninf;
terapéutica Ninf;
terrateniente Ninf;
tétano Ninf;
timbal Ninf;
tíquico Ninf;
titular Ninf;
tonada Ninf;
torio Ninf;
totalidad Ninf;
traición Ninf;
transgresión Ninf;
trascripción Ninf;
travesaño Ninf;
trigo Ninf;
trolebús Ninf;
truhán Ninf;
túnel Ninf;
ucraniano Ninf;
ungüento Ninf;
urinario Ninf;
utopía Ninf;
valdo Ninf;
vandalismo Ninf;
vascongado Ninf;
vejete Ninf;
veneno Ninf;
veranillo Ninf;
vertán Ninf;
viajero Ninf;
vídeo Ninf;
vino Ninf;
viscosidad Ninf;
viticultora Ninf;
voz Ninf;
votación Ninf;
whisky Ninf;
yaguareté Ninf;
yeso Ninf;
zacarías Ninf;
zapapico Ninf;
zinc Ninf;
zulú Ninf;
